FST/mermish.lexc
!!! mermish.lexc !!!
!!! Alison Hau (ahau), April 2020 !!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +V +Sg +Du +Pl +Nom +Acc + Adp +Poss +Prs +Pst +Fut +Perf +Imp +1st +2nd +3rd +Perf +Imp +Inc +Exc +2Ord


LEXICON Root

	Prefix ;
        Verb ;
	Pronoun ;

LEXICON Prefix

2Ord+:ak^ Noun;
 Noun;


LEXICON Pronoun

Pro+Sg+3rd+Nom:Za	#;
Pro+Sg+3rd+Acc:ZaAr	#;
Pro+Sg+3rd+Adp:ZaA	#;


LEXICON Noun

SSeSS 	Nnum;
saZIm 	Nnum;
saIp	Nnum;
xEt	Nnum;
eNek	Nnum;
anInEm	Nnum;
simU	Nnum;

LEXICON Nnum

+Sg:0	NScase;
+Du:0	NDcase;
+Pl:0	NPcase;

LEXICON NScase

+Nom:0		#;
+Acc:^Ar	#;
+Adp:^A		#;
+Poss:^It	#;

LEXICON NDcase

+Nom:^m		#;
+Acc:^ir	#;
+Adp:^i		#;
+Poss:^wE	#;

LEXICON NPcase

+Nom:^He	#;
+Acc:^r		#;
+Adp:^@		#;
+Poss:^sfE	#;


LEXICON Verb

Ins	Vpn;
Hei	Vpn;
Ummi	Vpn;
Uss	Vpn;
lEk	Vpn;
alz	Vpn;
eIN	Vpn;

LEXICON Vpn

+1st+Sg:0	V1Stense;
+2nd+Sg:0	V2Stense;
+3rd+Sg:0	V3Stense;

+1st+Du+Inc:0	V1DItense;
+1st+Du+Exc:0	V1DEtense;
+2nd+Du:0	V2Dtense;
+3rd+Du:0	V3Dtense;

+1st+Pl+Inc:0	V1PItense;
+1st+Pl+Exc:0	V1PEtense;
+2nd+Pl:0	V2Ptense;
+3rd+Pl:0	V3Ptense;


LEXICON V1Stense
+Pst:^Em	VPerf;
+Prs:^Et	VPerf;
+Fut:^iwi	VPerf;


LEXICON V2Stense
+Pst:^Ema	VPerf;
+Prs:^E		VPerf;
+Fut:^ini	VPerf;

LEXICON V3Stense
+Pst:^ama	VPerf;
+Prs:^a		VPerf;
+Fut:^ima	VPerf;

LEXICON V1DItense
+Pst:^Emsala	VPerf;
+Prs:^Ems	VPerf;
+Fut:^Ila	VPerf;

LEXICON V1DEtense
+Pst:^EmsAlt	VPerf;
+Prs:^Emsa	VPerf;
+Fut:^Ilt	VPerf;

LEXICON V2Dtense
+Pst:UrTa	VPerf;
+Prs:^UrT	VPerf;
+Fut:IT		VPerf;

LEXICON V3Dtense
+Pst:^lIna	VPerf;
+Prs:^lIt	VPerf;
+Fut:^Im	VPerf;

LEXICON V1PItense
+Pst:^EITE	VPerf;
+Prs:^EIT	VPerf;
+Fut:^EITi	VPerf;

LEXICON V1PEtense
+Pst:^aITE	VPerf;
+Prs:^aIT	VPerf;
+Fut:^aITi	VPerf;

LEXICON V2Ptense
+Pst:^eaImE	VPerf;
+Prs:^eaI	VPerf;
+Fut:^ITl	VPerf;

LEXICON V3Ptense
+Pst:^linE	VPerf;
+Prs:^lit	VPerf;
+Fut:^Iml	VPerf;

LEXICON VPerf
+Perf:0		#;
+Imp:^wAt	#;
